Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Chapter 23. Health Care Services Information and Review Organizations.

Editor’s notes. —

In

Plumley v. Hale,

594 P.2d 497 (Alaska 1979), the Supreme Court of Alaska held that although ch. 102, SLA 1976, which enacted this chapter as well as several other provisions in the Alaska Statutes including AS

09.55.536

, was enacted in violation of the recorded vote requirement of art. II, § 14 of the Alaska Constitution, ch. 102, SLA 1976 is still valid. See the notes to decisions following Alaska Const., art. II, § 14 and AS

09.55.536

.

Collateral references. —

39 Am. Jur. 2d, Health, §§ 24 et seq., 84 et seq.

39A C.J.S., Health and Environment, §§ 3 — 17, 47.

Validity of regulations as to contraceptives or the dissemination of birth control information.
96 ALR2d 955.

Right of voluntary disclosure of privileged proceedings of hospital medical review or doctor evaluation processes.
60 ALR4th 1273.

Discovery, in medical malpractice action, of names of other patients to whom defendant has given treatment similar to that allegedly injuring plaintiff. 66 ALR5th 591.